Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.540

Jurisdiction of superior courts—Who may bring action.

The several superior courts of the state of Washington are hereby vested with jurisdiction:

(1) Specifically to enforce this chapter and the provisions of each and every marketing agreement and order issued pursuant to this chapter and each and every term, condition and provision thereof;

(2) To prevent, restrain, and enjoin pending litigation and thereafter permanently any person from violating this chapter or the provisions of any such agreement or order and each and every term, condition, and provision thereof, regardless of the existence of any other remedy at law;

(3) To require pending litigation and thereafter permanently by mandatory injunction each and every person subject to the provisions of any such agreement or order to carry out and perform the provisions of this chapter an each and every duty imposed upon him or her by such marketing agreement or order.

The director or any administrator or board under any marketing agreement or order, in the name of the state of Washington, or any person affected or regulated by or subject to any marketing order or agreement issued pursuant to this chapter upon joining the director as a party may bring or cause to be brought actions or proceedings for specific performance, restraint, injunction, or mandatory injunction against any person who violates or refuses to perform the obligations or duties imposed upon him or her by this chapter or by any marketing agreement or order issued pursuant to this chapter and said courts shall have jurisdiction of such cause and shall grant such relief upon proof of such violation or threatened violation or refusal.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6090; 1961 c 256 s 54.]